North Dakota, session 69, HB1449.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-06-19 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
15.1-06-19. Counselor positions - Requirement.
1. Beginning with the 2010-11 school year, eachA school district mustshall make a
reasonable effort to have available one full-time equivalent school counselor for every
three hundred students in grades seven through twelve.
2. Beginning with the 2022-23 school year, eachA school district mustshall make a
reasonable effort to have available one full-time equivalent school counselor for every
three hundred students in grades kindergarten through six.
3. Up to one-third of the full-time equivalency requirement established in subsection 1
may be met by career advisors.
4. For purposes of this section, a "career advisor" means an individual who holds a
certificate in career development facilitation issued by the department of career and
technical education under section 15-20.1-24 or an individual who is provisionally
approved by the department of career and technical education under section
15-20.1-25 to serve as a career advisor.
5. The requirement under subsection 1 or 2 is met if the school district :
a. Actively recruited and attempted to hire the requisite number of qualified school
counselors or career advisors;
Page No. 1 25.1194.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. Explored alternative methods to meet student needs if a ful l - time counselor
position was not filled, including shared services agreements with other districts,
contracted services, or virtual counseling options; and
c. Documented the actions taken under subdivisions a and b .
6. A school district shall provide upon request to any individual the documentation under
subsection 5 .
Page No. 2 25.1194.01000